tests/verbs-TAD.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nalkwena
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nalkwenaok
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nteluxola
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nteluxolaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpaha
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpahaok
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kewinewama
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kewinewamaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kenalkwena
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kenalkwenaok
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kteluxola
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kteluxolaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : pahao
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : pahaok #"k" marked in ()
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : winewamao
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : winewamaok #"k" marked in ()

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : nalkwenao
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : nalkwenaok #"k" marked in ()
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : eluxolao
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : eluxolaok #"k" marked in ()

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpahawena
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpahawenanak
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newinewamawena
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newinewamawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nalkwenawena
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nalkwenawenanak
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nteluxolawena
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nteluxolawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpahawena
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpahawenanak
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kewinewamawena
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kewinewamawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kenalkwenawena
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kenalkwenawenanak
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kteluxolawena
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kteluxolawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kpahawa
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kpahawaok
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kewinewamawa
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kewinewamawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kenalkwenawa
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kenalkwenawaok
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kteluxolawa
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kteluxolawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : pahawoo
    winewam<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : winewamawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : nalkwenawoo
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : eluxolawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntelapehwa
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntelapehwaok
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkelaphatuna
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkelaphatunaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nshinkala
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nshinkalaok
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : notuma
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : notumaok
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktelapehwa
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktelapehwaok
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kelaphatuna
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kelaphatunaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kshinkala
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kshinkalaok
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kenotuma
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kenotumaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : elapehwao
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : elapehwaok #"k" marked in ()
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : kelaphatunao
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : kelaphatunaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : shinkalao
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : shinkalaok
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : notumao
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : notumaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntelapehwawena
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntelapehwawenanak
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkelaphatunawena
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkelaphatunawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nshinkalawena
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nshinkalawenanak
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkelaphatunawena
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkelaphatunawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktelapehwawena
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktelapehwawenanak
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kelaphatunawena
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kelaphatunawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kshinkalawena
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kshinkalawenanak
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : notumawena
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : notumawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : ktelapehwawena
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : ktelapehwawenanak
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kelaphatunawa
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kelaphatunawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kshinkalawa
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kshinkalawaok
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kenotumawena
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kenotumawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : elapehwawoo
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : kelaphatunawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : shinkalawoo
    notum<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : notumawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkiska
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkiskaok
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemathakala
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemathakalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : mpemetunhala
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : mpemetunhalaok
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nekala
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nekalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kiska
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kiskaok
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemathakala
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemathakalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kiska
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kiskaok
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : knekala
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : knekalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : kiskku
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : kiskku
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : mathakalao
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : mathakalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : pemetunhalao
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : pemetunhalaok
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : nekalao
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : nekalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkiskawena
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkiskawenanak
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemathakalawena
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemathakalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpemetunhalawena #added "a" / l_w as it being absent appears to be an error
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> :  mpemetunhalawenanak
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nekalawena
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nekalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : nkiskkuna
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : nkiskkunanak
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemathakalawena
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemathakalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpemetunhalawena
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpemetunhalawenanak
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : knekalawena
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : knekalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kshinkalawa
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kshinkalawaok
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kemathakalawa
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kemathakalawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kpemetunhalawa #added "a" / l_w as its absence appeared to be error
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kpemetunhalawaok
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : knekalawa
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : knekalawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    kisk<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : kiskkuwoo
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : mathakalawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : pemetunhawoo
    nekal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : nekalawao

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 13) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : noxkuma
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : noxkumaok
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : natuxta           #notuxt also possible
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : natuxtaok
